Utah statutes.
57-1-23.   Sale of trust property -- Power of trustee -- Foreclosure of
trust deed.
The trustee who is qualified under Subsection 57-1-21(1)(a)(i) or (iv) is
given the power of sale by which the trustee may exercise and cause the trust
property to be sold in the manner provided in Sections 57-1-24 and 57-1-27,
after a breach of an obligation for which the trust property is conveyed as
security; or, at the option of the beneficiary, a trust deed may be foreclosed
in the manner provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on real
property. The power of sale may be exercised by the trustee without express
provision for it in the trust deed.
